Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.008

Commission—Contraceptive availability awareness.

To increase awareness of the availability of contraceptives in pharmacies, the pharmacy quality assurance commission shall develop a sticker or sign to be displayed on the window or door of a pharmacy that initiates or modifies drug therapy related to self-administered contraception.

[ 2016 c 132 s 1.]